src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-T-I-oowatoo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - oowatoo - ok : # -m inanimate transitive verb, eat AEW NA1
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitáówatoohpa
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kitáówatoohpa
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+D3Sg: áówatoomaayi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nitáówatoohpinnaana
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: áówatoo'pa
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitáówatoohpoaawa
     
     Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitáaksowatoohpa
     Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitáaksowatoohpa
     Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+D3Sg: áaksowatoomaayi
     Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nitáaksowatoohpinnaana
     Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: áaksowatoo'pa
     Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitáaksowatoohpoaawa
     
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nitsowatoohpa
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kitsowatoohpa
     Past+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+D3Sg: iiwátoomaayi
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nitsowatoohpinnaana
     Past+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: iiwatoo'pa
     oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kitsowatoohpoaawa
     
     Neg+Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaatáówatoohpa
     Neg+Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kimaatáówatoohpa
     Neg+Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO+PRO+3Pl+PRO+D3Sg: maatáówatoomaiksayi
     Neg+Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nimaatáówatoohpinnaana
     Neg+Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: maatáówatoo'pa
     Neg+Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kimaatáówatoohpoaawa
     
     Neg+Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaatáaksowatoohpa
     Neg+Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kimaatáaksowatoohpa
     Neg+Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO: maatáaksowatoomaatsayi
     Neg+Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nimaatáaksowatoohpinnaana
     Neg+Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: maatáaksowatoo'pa
     Neg+Fut+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kimaatáaksowatoohpoaawa
     
     Neg+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Sg+0SgO: nimaatsowatoohpa
     Neg+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Sg+0SgO: kimaatsowatoohpa
     Neg+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+3Sg+0SgO: maatsowatoomaatsayi
     Neg+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+1Pl+0SgO: nimaatsowatoohpinnaana
     Neg+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+21Pl+0SgO: maatsowatoo'pa
     Neg+oowatoo+VTI+Ind+2Pl+0SgO: kimaatsowatoohpoaawa
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Sg+0SgO: nitáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Sg+0SgO: kitáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Sg+0SgO: otáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Sg+0SgO: áówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Sg+0PlO: nitáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Sg+0PlO: kitáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Sg+0PlO: otáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Sg+0PlO: áówatoohsi
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Pl+0SgO: nitáówatoohsinnaani
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+21Pl+0SgO: áówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Pl+0SgO: kitáówatoohsoaayi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Pl+0SgO: otáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Pl+0SgO: áówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+1Pl+0PlO: nitáówatoohsinnaani
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+21Pl+0PlO: áówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+2Pl+0PlO: kitáówatoohsoaayi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+3Pl+0PlO: otáówatoohsi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Cnj+4Pl+0PlO: áówatoohsi
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Sg+0SgO: áówatoommiiniki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Sg+0SgO: áówatoommiiniki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Sg+0SgO: áówatoisi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Sg+0SgO: áówatoisi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Sg+0PlO: áówatoommiiniki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Sg+0PlO: áówatoommiiniki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Sg+0PlO: áówatoisi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Sg+0PlO: áówatoisi
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Pl+0SgO: áówatoommiinnainiki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+21Pl+0SgO: áówatoommiinoainiki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Pl+0SgO: áówatoi'ki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Pl+0SgO: áówatoisi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Pl+0SgO: áówatoisi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+1Pl+0PlO: áówatoommiinnainiki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+21Pl+0PlO: áówatoommiinoainiki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+2Pl+0PlO: áówatoi'ki
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+3Pl+0PlO: áówatoisi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Sbj+4Pl+0PlO: áówatoisi
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Sg+0SgO: nitáówatoohtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Sg+0SgO: kitáówatoohtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Sg+0SgO: áówatoomahtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Sg+0SgO: áówatoomahtopiyini
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Sg+0PlO: nitáówatoohtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Sg+0PlO: kitáówatoohtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Sg+0PlO: áówatoomahtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Sg+0PlO: áówatoomahtopiyini
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Pl+0SgO: nitáówatoohpinnaanopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+21Pl+0SgO: áówatoo'pohtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Pl+0SgO: kitáówatoomahtopiyi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Pl+0SgO: áówatoomahtopiyi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Pl+0SgO: áówatoomahtopiyini
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+1Pl+0PlO: nitáówatoohpinnaanopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+21Pl+0PlO: áówatoo'pohtopi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+2Pl+0PlO: kitáówatoomahtopiyi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+3Pl+0PlO: áówatoomahtopiyi
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Irr+4Pl+0PlO: áówatoomahtopiyini
     
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+Sg+0SgO: áówatoota
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+Pl+0SgO: áówatooka
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+Sg+0PlO: áówatooti
     Dur+oowatoo+VTI+Imp+Pl+0PlO: áówatooki
